Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-2302
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Diploma
of High School Equivalency Assistance Act is to provide assistance to institutions
which offer high school equivalency programs in order to defray the costs
associated with participation in such programs.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 2.
June 5, 2013